Wisconsin, session 2025, SB892.
do enact as follows:SB892,11Section 1. 196.496 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 196.496 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB892,2,33196.496 (1) Definition Definitions. (intro.) In this section, “distributed:SB892,2,74(b) “Distributed generation facility” means a facility for the generation of 5electricity with a capacity of no more than 15 megawatts that is located near the 6point where the electricity will be used or is in a location that will support the 7functioning of the electric power distribution grid.SB892,28Section 2. 196.496 (1) (a), (c), (d) and (e) of the statutes are created to read:SB892,2,109196.496 (1) (a) “Commercial building” has the meaning given in s. 196.795 (1) 10(e).SB892,2,1111(c) “Electric provider” has the meaning given in s. 16.957 (1) (f).SB892,2,1212(d) “Residential building” means a one-family or 2-family dwelling.SB892,3,41(e) “Rooftop solar energy system” means photovoltaic equipment that directly 2converts solar energy into electricity, that can be interconnected behind the 3customer’s electric meter, and that can directly serve the energy load of the 4customer.SB892,35Section 3. 196.496 (2) (title) of the statutes is created to read:SB892,3,66196.496 (2) (title) Interconnection.SB892,47Section 4. 196.496 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 196.496 (2) (a).SB892,58Section 5. 196.496 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB892,3,129196.496 (2) (b) Rooftop solar energy systems. 1. An electric provider may not 10prohibit an interconnection with a rooftop solar energy system on the basis of the 11system’s generating capacity if the system’s generating capacity does not exceed any 12of the following:SB892,3,1313a. On a commercial building, 500 kilowatts.SB892,3,1414b. On a residential building, 30 kilowatts.SB892,3,17152. A rooftop solar energy system may not interconnect to electric distribution 16facilities unless the rooftop solar energy system includes advanced metering 17infrastructure and allows for meter aggregation.SB892,3,21183. An electric provider may not include in the calculation of a rooftop solar 19energy system’s generating capacity under subd. 1. the generating capacity, energy 20storage capacity, or discharge power rating of a battery energy storage system 21associated with the rooftop solar energy system.SB892,622Section 6. 196.496 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB892,4,423196.496 (3) Net metering billing system. (a) Net metering agreements. 24Each electric provider shall adopt a standardized net metering agreement to be 1used for all customer-owned rooftop solar energy systems that do not exceed the 2generating capacity limits under sub. (2) (b). All of the following apply to a 3standardized net metering agreement adopted by an electric provider under this 4paragraph:SB892,4,751. The electric provider shall bill a customer in accordance with normal billing 6practices for any electricity the customer uses in excess of the electricity generated 7by the customer’s rooftop solar energy system.SB892,4,1282. Except as provided under subd. 3. and par. (b), for any electricity generated 9by a customer’s rooftop solar energy system that is delivered to the electric 10provider’s electric power distribution grid, the electric provider shall issue to the 11customer a credit at a value of 100 percent of the retail rate of electricity to be 12applied against the customer’s electric bill in any subsequent month.SB892,4,14133. Credits issued to a customer under subd. 2. expire on March 31 of each 14calendar year.SB892,4,16154. A customer is not entitled to receive a cash payment for any credit issued 16under subd. 2. unless specifically authorized under federal law.SB892,4,18175. An electric provider may require that a credit issued under subd. 2. be used 18only toward a customer’s consumption of electricity.SB892,4,20196. Any unexpired credit issued under subd. 2. to a customer is transferable to 20a new owner of the building at the time of sale.SB892,4,23217. Any service or usage fee that an electric provider charges to a customer who 22owns a rooftop solar energy system shall be commensurate with service or usage 23fees charged to other customers of a similar class.SB892,5,121(b) Revised agreements. 1. An electric provider may revise a standardized net 2metering agreement under par. (a) if the adoption rate of rooftop solar energy 3systems in the electric provider’s service territory exceeds 10 percent in any of the 4preceding 12 months. The electric provider shall calculate the adoption rate of 5rooftop solar energy systems by dividing the aggregate gross power rating, in 6alternating current, of all in-service rooftop solar energy systems in the electric 7provider’s service territory by the total summer peak demand of the electric 8provider. For purposes of the calculation under this subdivision, an electric 9provider may not include in the aggregate gross power rating of all in-service 10rooftop solar energy systems the generating capacity, energy storage capacity, or 11discharge power rating of battery energy storage systems associated with those 12rooftop solar energy systems.SB892,5,14132. Paragraph (a) 1. to 7. apply to the revised agreement except that the value 14of a credit issued under par. (a) 2. is 90 percent of the retail rate of electricity.SB892,5,17153. The revised agreement takes effect 60 days after the electric provider 16provides written notice of the revision to all customers in the electric provider’s 17service territory.SB892,5,2218(c) Minimum standards. The standards for a standardized net metering 19agreement and revised standardized net metering agreement under this subsection 20are minimum standards. An electric provider may offer a standardized net 21metering agreement on terms more favorable to customers than those provided 22under this subsection.SB892,5,2323